Wyoming, session 2025, SF0070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-2-2302(b), 9-2-2303(a) by creating
a new paragraph (iv), 9-2-2304, 9-2-2306(a)(v),
9-2-2307(a), (b)(intro) and by creating a new subsection
(c), 9-15-103(a), (b) and (d), 9-15-104(e) and 9-15-105(a)
are amended to read:
9-2-2302. Legislative declaration.
(b) It is the purpose of this article to promote,
preserve and enhance Wyoming's unique cultural heritage by
creating a Wyoming cultural trust fund administered by a
trust fund board to coordinate public and private donations
and manage the distribution of the investment earnings
monies from the Wyoming cultural trust fund.
9-2-2303. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iv) "Income account" means the Wyoming cultural
trust fund income account created by W.S. 9-2-2304(a).
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
9-2-2304. Wyoming cultural trust fund established;
income account established; investment by state treasurer.
(a) The Wyoming cultural trust fund is created. The
Wyoming cultural trust fund shall consist of those funds
designated to the fund by law and all monies collected from
federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts,
bequests and donations to the cultural trust fund. The
Wyoming cultural trust fund income account is also hereby
created. The income account shall consist of those funds
credited to the income account pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2307(c)
and all other monies collected from federal grants and
other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations
specifically designated to the income account.
(b) The monies deposited into the Wyoming cultural
resources trust fund and income account established
pursuant to this section are inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. The monies shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the trust
fund and shall be invested by the state treasurer as
authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net
return possible consistent with the preservation of the
corpus or income account as required by this article. Any
earnings from investment of the corpus of the trust fund
and income account shall be credited by the state treasurer
into a separate account to the trust fund and distributed
in accordance with W.S. 9-2-2307 this article. The state
treasurer, or his designee, who shall be registered under
the Investment Advisor's Act of 1940, as amended, if
required to be registered by the terms of that act, as
amended, may invest the unobligated, unencumbered balance
of the trust fund in equities, including stocks of
corporations. Investments under this subsection shall be
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
in accordance with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and
9-4-716. In adopting investment policy statements for the
Wyoming cultural trust fund, the state loan and investment
board, in consultation with the investment funds committee,
shall seek to preserve the balance of the trust fund in a
manner that strives for the highest possible risk-adjusted
total net return consistent with an appropriate level of
safety and liquidity.
9-2-2306. Wyoming cultural trust fund board; duties
and responsibilities.
(a) The board shall:
(v) Review and monitor the expenditure of monies
from the trust fund income account to grantees; and
9-2-2307. Disbursement of grants.
(a) Subject to approval of applications from
nonprofit and governmental cultural, historical and arts
organizations, the board may award grants from the income
account to promote, preserve and enhance the unique
cultural heritage of Wyoming and its people.
(b) The board shall have the discretion in
determining the amount of money under each grant, except
that no grant shall be the total amount of grants awarded
until: in any one (1) fiscal year shall not exceed the
spending policy amount specified in subsection (c) of this
section plus additional sums as allowed under paragraph
(c)(ii) of this section.
(c) The amount of monies available for making grants
under this article in any one (1) fiscal year shall be an
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
amount equal to three percent (3%) of the five (5) year
average market value of the Wyoming cultural trust fund,
calculated from the first day of the fiscal year. This
amount shall constitute the spending policy for the trust
fund and shall, subject to legislative appropriation, be
annually credited from the trust fund to the income account
for expenditure on grants. This subsection shall be
subject to the following:
(i) For purposes of calculating the spending
policy under this subsection, the five (5) year average
market value of the trust fund shall be calculated as
follows:
(A) For fiscal year 2026, the five (5) year
average market value shall be equal to the market value of
the trust fund, as calculated on the first day of the
fiscal year;
(B) For fiscal year 2027, the five (5) year
average market value shall be equal to the previous two (2)
year average market value of the trust fund, as calculated
on the first day of the fiscal year;
(C) For fiscal year 2028, the five (5) year
average market value shall be equal to the previous three
(3) year average market value of the trust fund, as
calculated on the first day of the fiscal year;
(D) For fiscal year 2029, the five (5) year
average market value shall be equal to the previous four
(4) year average market value of the trust fund, as
calculated on the first day of the fiscal year;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(E) For fiscal year 2030 and each fiscal
year thereafter, the five (5) year average market value
shall be equal to the previous five (5) year average market
value of the trust fund, as calculated on the first day of
the fiscal year.
(ii) Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to limit the expenditure of the following monies
in the income account, which expenditures shall not be
counted within the spending policy:
(A) Special appropriations, grants,
transfers, bequests or donations to the income account
unless the appropriation, grant, gift, transfer, bequest or
donation provides otherwise;
(B) Unobligated and unencumbered monies in
the income account that were credited to the income account
in a prior fiscal year as part of that year's authorized
spending policy;
(C) Previously obligated or encumbered
monies in the income account.
9-15-103. Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust
account created; income account created; expenditures;
purposes.
(a) A trust account is created to be known as the
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account. The
trust account shall consist of those funds designated to
the account by law and all monies received from federal
grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers,
bequests and donations to the trust account. The trust
account is specifically empowered to accept grants, gifts,
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
transfers, bequests and donations including those which are
limited in their purposes by the grantor. Title to any
interest in any real property conveyed to the trust account
shall be held in the name of the state of Wyoming and shall
be administered by the board of land commissioners. Funds
deposited within the trust account are intended to be
inviolate and constitute a perpetual trust account which
shall be invested by The state treasurer, as authorized by
law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return
possible consistent with preservation of the account corpus
or his designee, who shall be registered under the
Investment Advisor's Act of 1940, as amended, if required
to be registered by the terms of that act, as amended, may
invest the unobligated, unencumbered balance of the trust
account in equities, including stocks of corporations.
Investments under this subsection shall be in accordance
with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and 9-4-716. In
adopting investment policy statements for the trust
account, the state loan and investment board, in
consultation with the investment funds committee, shall
seek to preserve the balance of the account in a manner
that strives for the highest possible risk-adjusted total
net return consistent with an appropriate level of safety
and liquidity. Earnings from the investment of the trust
account shall be credited to the trust account.
(b) The state treasurer shall credit to a There is
created the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust
income account. the earnings from investment of the trust
account corpus. The income account shall consist of funds
in the account on June 30, 2025, funds credited to the
account pursuant to paragraph (d)(ii) of this section and
all monies received from federal grants and other
contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and
donations designated to the income account, which the
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
account is hereby specifically empowered to accept and
which may be limited in their purposes by the grantor. The
legislature may, from time to time, appropriate funds
directly to the income account for distribution in
accordance with the terms of this act. Such specially
appropriated funds or as otherwise directed in the
appropriation. Earnings from the investment of the income
account shall be credited directly by the state treasurer
to the trust account created by subsection (a) of this
section. Funds in the income account and are available to
the board for the award of grants: as otherwise
(i) As permitted by this act;
(ii) As directed in a legislative appropriation;
or
(iii) As directed by the grantor of the funds.
(d) The board may expend funds from the income
account for staffing and other administrative expenses
authorized under this act. Additional shall be subject to
the following:
(i) Disbursements from the income account shall
be for the following purposes:
(i)(A) Improvement and maintenance of
existing terrestrial habitat necessary to maintain optimum
wildlife populations;
(ii)(B) Preservation of open spaces by
purchase or acquisition of development rights;
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii)(C) Improvement and maintenance of
existing aquatic habitat necessary to maintain optimum fish
populations;
(iv)(D) Acquisition of terrestrial or
aquatic habitat when existing habitat is determined
critical, or is present in minimal amounts, and acquisition
presents the necessary factor in attaining or preserving
desired wildlife or fish population levels;
(v)(E) Conservation, maintenance,
protection and development of wildlife resources, the
environment and Wyoming's natural resource heritage;
(vi)(F) Participation in water enhancement
projects to benefit aquatic habitat for fish populations
and allow for other watershed enhancements that benefit
wildlife;
(vii)(G) To address and mitigate impacts
detrimental to wildlife habitat, the environment and the
multiple use of renewable natural resources attributable to
residential, mineral and industrial development;
(viii)(H) To mitigate conflicts and reduce
potential for disease transmission between wildlife and
domestic livestock.
(ii) The amount of monies available for
expenditure from the income account in any one (1) fiscal
year shall be an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the
five (5) year average market value of the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust account, calculated from the
first day of the fiscal year. This amount shall constitute
the spending policy for the trust account and, subject to
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
legislative appropriation, shall be annually credited from
the trust account to the income account for expenditure on
grants. This paragraph shall be subject to the following:
(A) For purposes of calculating the
spending policy under this paragraph, the five (5) year
average market value of the trust account shall be
calculated as follows:
(I) For fiscal year 2026, the five (5)
year average market value shall be equal to the market
value of the trust account, as calculated on the first day
of the fiscal year;
(II) For fiscal year 2027, the five
(5) year average market value shall be equal to the
previous two (2) year average market value of the trust
account, as calculated on the first day of the fiscal year;
(III) For fiscal year 2028, the five
(5) year average market value shall be equal to the
previous three (3) year average market value of the trust
account, as calculated on the first day of the fiscal year;
(IV) For fiscal year 2029, the five
(5) year average market value shall be equal to the
previous four (4) year average market value of the trust
account, as calculated on the first day of the fiscal year;
(V) For fiscal year 2030 and each
fiscal year thereafter, the five (5) year average market
value shall be equal to the previous five (5) year average
market value of the trust account, as calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year.
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to limit the board from expending the following
monies, which expenditures shall not be counted within the
spending policy:
(I) Funds that are specially
appropriated or credited to the income account or trust
account under subsection (a) or (b) of this section when
the appropriation, contribution, grant, gift, transfer,
bequest or donation so provides;
(II) Funds as necessary for the
payment of staffing and other administrative expenses if
authorized by law;
(III) Unobligated and unencumbered
funds in the income account that were credited to the
income account in a prior fiscal year as part of that
year's authorized spending policy;
(IV) Previously obligated or
encumbered monies in the income account.
(C) Any amounts that are subject to
expenditure under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall
not be included in the calculation required to determine
the spending policy amount under this paragraph.
9-15-104. Wildlife and natural resource trust account
board established; terms; meetings; duties.
(e) The board shall receive and evaluate applications
for grants from the income account, and shall forward
applications for large projects to the select committee for
review and recommendation. The board may approve grants
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
for any small project. Subject to the spending policy
established in W.S. 9-15-103(d)(ii), funds in the income
account are continuously appropriated for small project
grants approved by the board and for approved large
projects as specified by subsection (k) of this section.
9-15-105. Grant applications; eligible entities.
(a) The board may only grant funds to nonprofit and
governmental organizations. The board shall award grants
to promote, preserve and enhance the wildlife, multiple
use, natural resource and environmental heritage of Wyoming
and its people. Subject to the spending policy limitations
established in W.S. 9-15-103(d)(ii), the board shall have
the discretion to determine the amount of each grant and
any conditions attached to the grant. For the purposes of
this act, a grant shall not be used for the acquisition of
a fee title interest in real property or any interest in
water rights to be held by the state of Wyoming. Grant
funds may be used for acquisition of personal property
related to the project receiving the grant.
Section 2. W.S. 9-2-2307(b)(i) and (ii),
9-4-715(p)(ii) and (iii) and 9-15-103(c) are repealed.
Section 3. The annual spending limits imposed on the
Wyoming cultural trust fund income account and the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust income account by the
spending policies adopted in this act shall not apply to
the expenditure of any monies deposited in either income
account before July 1, 2025. All monies in either income
account deposited before July 1, 2025 shall, after July 1,
2025, be subject to the same obligations that were
applicable before July 1, 2025.
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0070
ENROLLED ACT NO. 84, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
12